fst/morphology/affixes/noun_affixes.lexc
LEXICON NI_THEME_SUFFIX2
! Standard forms
@D.theme.IM2@0                                                                             NI_POSS_SUFFIXES ;
@D.dim.NULL@@R.theme.IM2@@C.sg@:@D.dim.NULL@@R.theme.IM2@@C.sg@%>i2m                       NI_POSS_SUFFIXES ;
! Non-standard forms
@D.dim.NULL@@R.theme.IM2@@P.err.Thm@0                                                      NI_POSS_SUFFIXES ;
@D.dim.NULL@@D.theme.IM2@@P.err.Thm@@C.sg@:@D.dim.NULL@@D.theme.IM2@@P.err.Thm@@C.sg@%>i2m NI_POSS_SUFFIXES ;

! LEXICON NI_POSS_IM_0_SUFFIX
! @D.person.NULL@@R.im.IM@@C.sg@:@D.person.NULL@@R.im.IM@@C.sg@%>i2m                       NI_DIM_SUFFIXES ;
! @D.person.NULL@@R.im.IM@@P.err.Thm@:@D.person.NULL@@R.im.IM@@P.err.Thm@0                 NI_DIM_SUFFIXES ; ! Incorrectly using 0-poss rather than im-poss
! @D.person.NULL@@D.im.IM@                                                                 NI_DIM_SUFFIXES ;
! @D.person.NULL@@D.im.IM@@C.sg@@P.err.Thm@:@D.person.NULL@@D.im.IM@@C.sg@@P.err.Thm@%>i2m NI_DIM_SUFFIXES ; ! Incorrectly using im-poss rather than 0-poss
! @R.person.NULL@                                                              NI_DIM_SUFFIXES ;
! 
! LEXICON NI_DIM_SUFFIXES
! NI_POSS_SUFFIXES ;
! Independent NIs
! @D.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@D.isis.ISIS@@C.sg@+Der/Dim+N+I:@D.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@D.isis.ISIS@@C.sg@%>i2%^DIMs                         NI_POSS_SUFFIXES ;
! @D.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@D.is.IS@@C.sg@+Der/Dim+N+I:@D.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@D.is.IS@@C.sg@%>i2%^DIMsis                               NI_POSS_SUFFIXES ;
! @D.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@R.isis.ISIS@@P.err2.Dim@@C.sg@+Der/Dim+N+I:@D.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@R.isis.ISIS@@P.err2.Dim@@C.sg@%>i2%^DIMs NI_POSS_SUFFIXES ;
! @D.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@R.is.IS@@P.err2.Dim@@C.sg@+Der/Dim+N+I:@D.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@R.is.IS@@P.err2.Dim@@C.sg@%>i2%^DIMsis       NI_POSS_SUFFIXES ;
! Dependent NIs
! @R.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@D.isis.ISIS@@C.sg@+Der/Dim+N+I+D:@R.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@D.isis.ISIS@@C.sg@%>i2%^DIMs                         NI_POSS_SUFFIXES ;
! @R.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@D.is.IS@@C.sg@+Der/Dim+N+I+D:@R.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@D.is.IS@@C.sg@%>i2%^DIMsis                               NI_POSS_SUFFIXES ;
! @R.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@R.isis.ISIS@@P.err2.Dim@@C.sg@+Der/Dim+N+I+D:@R.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@R.isis.ISIS@@P.err2.Dim@@C.sg@%>i2%^DIMs NI_POSS_SUFFIXES ;
! @R.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@R.is.IS@@@P.err2.Dim@C.sg@+Der/Dim+N+I+D:@R.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@R.is.IS@@P.err2.Dim@@C.sg@%>i2%^DIMsis       NI_POSS_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON NI_POSS_SUFFIXES
! Singular possessors
@U.person.NI@+Px1Sg:@U.person.NI@0 NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.KI@+Px2Sg:@U.person.KI@0 NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.O@+Px3Sg:@U.person.O@0   NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.NULL@                    NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
! Plural possessors
@U.person.NI@@C.sg@+Px1Pl:@U.person.NI@@C.sg@%>i2nân  NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.KI@@C.sg@+Px12Pl:@U.person.KI@@C.sg@%>i2naw NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.KI@@C.sg@+Px2Pl:@U.person.KI@@C.sg@%>i2wâw  NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.O@@C.sg@+Px3Pl:@U.person.O@@C.sg@0%>i2wâw   NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
! Obviative possessor
@U.person.O@@C.sg@@C.sg@+Px4Sg/Pl:@U.person.O@@C.sg@@C.sg@%>i2thiw NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
! Unspecified possessor
@U.person.MI@+PxX:@U.person.MI@0        NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
NI_POSS_LOC_COMBO_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON NI_POSS_LOC_COMBO_SUFFIXES
! Singular possessors
@U.person.NI@+Px1Sg+Loc:@U.person.NI@%>i2hk  NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.NI@+Px1Sg+Loc:@U.person.NI@%>i2h  NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.KI@+Px2Sg+Loc:@U.person.KI@%>i2hk NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.KI@+Px2Sg+Loc:@U.person.KI@%>i2h NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.O@+Px3Sg+Loc:@U.person.O@%>i2hk   NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.O@+Px3Sg+Loc:@U.person.O@%>i2h   NOUN_ENDLEX ;
! @U.person.NULL@                    NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
! Plural possessors
@U.person.NI@+Px1Pl+Loc:@U.person.NI@%>i2nâhk  NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.NI@+Px1Pl+Loc:@U.person.NI@%>i2nâh  NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.KI@+Px12Pl+Loc:@U.person.KI@%>i2nâhk NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.KI@+Px12Pl+Loc:@U.person.KI@%>i2nâh NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.KI@+Px2Pl+Loc:@U.person.KI@%>i2wâhk  NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.KI@+Px2Pl+Loc:@U.person.KI@%>i2wâh  NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.O@+Px3Pl+Loc:@U.person.O@0%>i2wâhk   NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.O@+Px3Pl+Loc:@U.person.O@0%>i2wâh   NOUN_ENDLEX ;
! Obviative possessor
@U.person.O@+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc:@U.person.O@%>i2thihk NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.O@+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc:@U.person.O@%>i2thih NOUN_ENDLEX ;
! Unspecified possessor
@U.person.MI@+PxX+Loc:@U.person.MI@%>i2hk NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.MI@+PxX+Loc:@U.person.MI@%>i2h NOUN_ENDLEX ;

LEXICON NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES
@D.number.PL@ NI_NUMBER_SUFFIXES_SG ; 
@D.number.SG@+Pl:@D.number.SG@%>a NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@R.person.NULL@+Loc:@R.person.NULL@%>i2hk NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@R.person.NULL@+Loc:@R.person.NULL@%>i2h NOUN_ENDLEX ;
! @R.person.NULL@+Loc+Dial/East:@R.person.NULL@%>i2h NOUN_ENDLEX ;

LEXICON NI_NUMBER_SUFFIXES_SG
@D.sg@+Sg:@D.sg@0 NOUN_ENDLEX ; ! Zero Sg morpheme for non NI-4w cases
@R.sg.I@+Sg:@R.sg.I@%>i NOUN_ENDLEX ; ! -i singular (NI-4w), when no other preceding morphology (-im, -is(is))
!! Likely obsolete code
! @D.sg@+Sg:@D.sg@0 NOUN_ENDLEX ; ! Zero Sg morpheme for non NI-4w cases
! @R.person.NULL@@R.sg.I@+Sg:@R.person.NULL@@R.sg.I@%>i NOUN_ENDLEX ; ! -i-singular (NI-4w), when no other morphology
! @D.person.NULL@@R.im.IM@@R.err.Thm@@R.sg.I@+Sg:@D.person.NULL@@R.im.IM@@R.err.Thm@@R.sg.I@%>i    NOUN_ENDLEX ; ! i-singular (NI-4w), when -im possessive theme required but missing
! @D.person.NULL@@R.im.IM@@D.err.Thm@@R.sg.I@+Sg:@D.person.NULL@@R.im.IM@@D.err.Thm@@R.sg.I@0    NOUN_ENDLEX ; ! 0-singular (NI-4w), when -im possessive theme required and found 
! @D.person.NULL@@D.im.IM@@R.err.Thm@@R.poss.PL@@R.sg.I@+Sg:@D.person.NULL@@D.im.IM@@R.err.Thm@@R.poss.PL@@R.sg.I@%>i NOUN_ENDLEX ; ! i-singular (NI-4w), when plural possession and incorrect 0 possessive theme
! @D.person.NULL@@D.im.IM@@D.err.Thm@@R.poss.PL@@R.sg.I@+Sg:@D.person.NULL@@D.im.IM@@D.err.Thm@@R.poss.PL@@R.sg.I@0 NOUN_ENDLEX ; ! 0-singular (NI-4w), when plural possession and incorrect -im possessive theme
! @D.person.NULL@@D.im.IM@@R.err.Thm@@D.poss.PL@@R.sg.I@+Sg:@D.person.NULL@@D.im.IM@@R.err.Thm@@D.poss.PL@@R.sg.I@0 NOUN_ENDLEX ; ! 0-singular (NI-4w), when singular possession and incorrect -im possessive theme
! @D.person.NULL@@D.im.IM@@D.err.Thm@@D.poss.PL@@R.sg.I@+Sg:@D.person.NULL@@D.im.IM@@D.err.Thm@@D.poss.PL@@R.sg.I@%>i NOUN_ENDLEX ; ! -i-singular (NI-4w), when singular possession and correct 0 possessive theme

!! Irregular nouns

LEXICON NOUN_IRREGULARS
! Irregular forms of ôsi
ôsi+N+I+Px1Sg:nitôt OSI_SUFFIXES ;
ôsi+N+I+Px2Sg:kitôt OSI_SUFFIXES ;
ôsi+N+I+Px3Sg:otôt OSI_SUFFIXES ;
ôsi+N+I+Px1Pl:nitôtinân OSI_SUFFIXES ;
ôsi+N+I+Px12Pl:kitôtinaw OSI_SUFFIXES ;
ôsi+N+I+Px2Pl:kitôtiwâw OSI_SUFFIXES ;
ôsi+N+I+Px3Pl:otôtiwâw OSI_SUFFIXES ;
ôsi+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl:otôtithiw OSI_SUFFIXES ;
! Locative combos
ôsi+N+I+Px1Sg+Loc:nitôtihk # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px1Sg+Loc:nitôtih # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px2Sg+Loc:kitôtihk # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px2Sg+Loc:kitôtih # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px3Sg+Loc:otôtihk # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px3Sg+Loc:otôtih # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px1Pl+Loc:nitôtinâhk # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px1Pl+Loc:nitôtinâh # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px12Pl+Loc:kitôtinâhk # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px12Pl+Loc:kitôtinâh # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px2Pl+Loc:kitôtiwâhk # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px2Pl+Loc:kitôtiwâh # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px3Pl+Loc:otôtiwâhk # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px3Pl+Loc:otôtiwâh # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc:otôtithihk # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc:otôtithih # ;

LEXICON OSI_SUFFIXES
+Sg:0 # ;
+Pl:a # ;


!! NOUN_ENDLEXs for wrapping up various things

LEXICON NOUN_ENDLEX
! Adding diminutive trigger to lexicalized diminutives to palatalize potential poss. person prefixes
@R.dim.DIM@:@R.dim.DIM@%^DIM NOUN_ENDLEX2 ;
@D.dim.DIM@ NOUN_ENDLEX2 ;

LEXICON NOUN_ENDLEX2
@R.err.Thm@+Err/Thm:@R.err.Thm@0 NOUN_ENDLEX3 ;
@D.err.Thm@ NOUN_ENDLEX3 ;

LEXICON NOUN_ENDLEX3
@R.err2.Dim@+Err/Dim:@R.err2.Dim@0 NOUN_ENDLEX4 ;
@D.err2.Dim@ NOUN_ENDLEX4 ;

LEXICON NOUN_ENDLEX4
@D.frag.FRAG@@D.cnj.CC@@R.joiner.NULL@+Err/Orth:@D.frag.FRAG@@D.cnj.CC@@R.joiner.NULL@ # ;
@D.frag.FRAG@@D.cnj.CC@@D.joiner.NULL@ # ;
! Adding changed conjunct trigger: IC
@D.frag.FRAG@@R.cnj.CC@@R.joiner.NULL@+Err/Orth:@D.frag.FRAG@@R.cnj.CC@@R.joiner.NULL@%^IC # ;
@D.frag.FRAG@@R.cnj.CC@@D.joiner.NULL@:@D.frag.FRAG@@R.cnj.CC@@D.joiner.NULL@%^IC # ;
! Stem-only fragments
! @R.frag.FRAG@ VERB_FRAG_END ;

!! End of noun affixes LEXC code
